Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1009
Option school
districts; net option funding; calculation.

(1)(a) A district shall receive
net option funding if option students as defined in section 79-233 (i) were actually enrolled
in the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the aid
is to be paid or (ii) will
be enrolled in the school year in which the aid is to be paid as converted
contract option students.

(b) The determination of the
net number of option students shall be based on (i) the number of students enrolled in the district
as option students and the number of students residing in the district but
enrolled in another district as option students as of the day of the fall
membership count pursuant to section 79-528, for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, and (ii) the number of option students that will be enrolled
in the district or enrolled in another district as converted contract option
students for the fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid.

(c) Net number of option students
means the difference of the number of option students enrolled in the district
minus the number of students residing in the district but enrolled in another
district as option students.

(2) For purposes of this section, net option funding shall be the sum of the product
of the net number of option students multiplied by the statewide average basic
funding per formula student.

(3) A district's net option funding shall be zero if the
calculation produces a negative result.

Payments made under this section shall be made from the funds
to be disbursed under section 79-1005.01.

Such payments shall go directly to the option school district
but shall count as a formula resource for the local system.

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 40;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 833, § 5;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1093, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 35;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 14.